Missouri, session 2026, HB3527.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.692, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 217.692, to read as follows:
217.692. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any offender
incarcerated in a correctional institution serving any sentence [of life with no parole for fifty
years or life without parole, whose plea of guilt was entered or whose trial commenced prior
to December 31, 1990,] and who:
(1) Pleaded guilty to or was found guilty of [a homicide of a spouse or domestic
partner] an offense stemming directly from the offender's history of abuse by a spouse,
domestic partner, intimate partner, household member, or sexual or labor trafficker
including, but not limited to, homicide of such abuser;
(2) Has no prior violent felony convictions;
(3) No longer has a cognizable legal claim or legal recourse; and
(4) Has a history of being a victim of continual and substantial physical,
psychological, or sexual domestic violence [that was not presented as an affirmative defense
at trial or sentencing] or sexual or labor trafficking within five years prior to or on the
date of the offense for which he or she was convicted and such violence or trafficking
was a contributing factor to the behavior underlying his or her criminal conviction and
such history can be corroborated with evidence of facts or circumstances which existed at the
time of the alleged physical, psychological, or sexual domestic violence or sexual or labor
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3527 2
trafficking of the offender, including but not limited to witness statements, hospital records,
social services records, and law enforcement records;

shall be eligible for parole after having served [fifteen years] the lesser of five years or one-
third of such sentence when the parole board determines by using the guidelines established
by this section that there is a strong and reasonable probability that the person will not
thereafter violate the law.
2. The parole board shall give a thorough review of the case history and prison record
of any offender described in subsection 1 of this section. At the end of the parole board's
review, the parole board shall provide the offender with a copy of a statement of reasons for
its parole decision. If the parole board denies parole, the offender may reapply for board
review under this section once every two years.
3. Any offender released under the provisions of this section shall be under the
supervision of the division of probation and parole for an amount of time to be determined by
the parole board.
4. The parole board shall consider, but not be limited to the following criteria when
making its parole decision:
(1) Length of time served;
(2) Prison record and self-rehabilitation efforts;
(3) Whether the history of the case included corroborative material of physical,
sexual, [mental,] or [emotional] psychological abuse or sexual or labor trafficking of the
offender, including but not limited to witness statements, hospital records, social service
records, and law enforcement records;
(4) [If an offer of a plea bargain was made and if so, why the offender rejected or
accepted the offer;
(5)] Any victim information outlined in subsection 10 of section 217.690 and section
595.209;
[(6) The offender's continued claim of innocence;
(7)] (5) The age and maturity of the offender at the time of the parole board's
decision;
[(8)] (6) The age and maturity of the offender at the time of the crime and any
contributing influence affecting the offender's judgment;
[(9)] (7) The presence of a workable parole plan; and
[(10)] (8) Community and family support.
5. It shall not be considered a negative factor for determining parole eligibility if
an offender was unable to participate in treatment or other programming while

HB 3527 3
incarcerated despite the willingness of the offender to participate in such treatment or
programming.
6. Nothing in this section shall limit the review of any offender's case who is eligible
for parole prior to [fifteen] fiveyears, nor shall it limit in any way the parole board's power to
grant parole prior to [fifteen] five years.
[6.] 7. Nothing in this section shall limit the review of any offender's case who has
applied for executive clemency, nor shall it limit in any way the governor's power to grant
clemency.
[7.] 8. It shall be the responsibility of the offender to petition the parole board for a
hearing under this section. There shall be a presumption in favor of granting a hearing on
a petition filed under this section. A hearing for an offender described in subsection 1 of
this section shall be denied only if the parole board determines that there is an inherent
lack of reliability of the facts asserted in the petition or a deficiency in the factual
allegations in the petition. If the parole board determines that the offender is not
entitled to a hearing, the board shall provide written findings of fact outlining the
reasons for such decision.
[8. A person commits the crime of perjury if he or she, with the purpose to deceive,
knowingly makes a false witness statement to the parole board. Perjury under this section
shall be a class D felony.]
9. In cases where witness statements alleging physical, psychological, or sexual
domestic violence or sexual or labor trafficking are in conflict as to whether such violence
occurred or was continual and substantial in nature, the history of such alleged violence shall
be established by other corroborative evidence in addition to witness statements, as provided
by subsection 1 of this section. A contradictory statement of the victim shall not be deemed a
conflicting statement for purposes of this section.
✔